Connecticut, session 2026, SB00235.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 14-78 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A drivers' school licensee shall permit a student to request that
such student's instructor be of a certain gender at the time of enrolling
in such licensee's behind-the-wheel instruction of a driver education
program and if such licensee cannot accommodate such request at the
time of any such instruction, such licensee shall allow the student to
reschedule such instruction without charging such student an
additional fee or penalty.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, if a driver's school licensee
maintains an Internet web site for its business, a drivers' school licensee
shall prominently post on such web site information indicating whether
or not such licensee has undertaken the following safety measures: (1)
The instructors employed by such licensee have successfully completed
proficiency testing as administered by the Department of Motor
Vehicles, (2) such instructors receive annual training or continuing
education, (3) such licensee utilizes an electronical monitoring system,
such as a global positioning system, to ensure the location of a student
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 235
is ascertainable during the provision of any behind-the-wheel
instruction, (4) such licensee utilizes an audio or video monitoring
system, such as a dashboard camera, inside or outside the motor vehicle
to ensure the safety of a student during the provision of any such
instruction, and (5) the vehicles used by such licensee to provide such
instruction have passed the annual inspection by the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(c) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, regarding the conduct of drivers' schools and
instructor license requirements. Such regulations shall (1) establish the
conduct of drivers' schools, including, but not limited to, (A)
requirements as to the inspection of the vehicles used by the drivers'
schools in the conduct of their business, (B) instructional standards and
procedures, including instruction of not less than fifteen minutes
concerning the responsibilities of an operator of a motor vehicle under
subsection (b) of section 14-223 and the penalty for a violation of the
provisions of said subsection, instruction concerning highway work
zone safety and the responsibilities of an operator of a motor vehicle
under section 14-212d, [and] instruction concerning ways to reduce
incidents of operators driving in the wrong direction and actions to take
when an operator encounters a motor vehicle being operated in the
wrong direction and behind-the-wheel instruction and practice
concerning how to stop in a safe location off the traveled portion of the
highway and respond to a traffic stop by a law enforcement officer, (C)
the administration of a test at the conclusion of each class, (D) the
posting of rates charged for instruction, and (E) the general form in
which records concerning persons under instruction and those who
have completed their course of instruction shall be kept and, when
required, the method of transmission to the commissioner, (2) except as
required pursuant to section 14-36j, permit a class or classroom
instruction to be offered in person in a congregate setting, through
distance learning or through a combination of both in-person and
distance learning, provided such distance learning has interactive
components such as mandatory interactions, participation or testing,
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 235
and (3) establish the requirements for a person to receive a license as an
instructor in accordance with section 14-73.
(d) On and after October 1, 2010, the commissioner shall not issue a
license that is limited to classroom instruction. Any person who was
issued such limited license prior to October 1, 2010, may maintain and
renew such license.
Sec. 2. Section 14-36f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, governing the
establishment, conduct and scope of driver education programs in
secondary schools of this state, subject to the requirements of section 14-
36e. Such regulations shall (1) permit any local or regional board of
education or private secondary school to contract with a licensed
drivers' school approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles for the
behind-the-wheel instruction of such driver education program and
instruction therein may be given by such school's driving instructors
who are licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles, (2) require that
the classroom instruction of any such driver education program include
(A) a discussion concerning highway work zone safety and the
responsibilities of an operator of a motor vehicle under section 14-212d,
and (B) a discussion concerning ways to reduce incidents of operators
driving in the wrong direction and actions to take when an operator
encounters a motor vehicle being operated in the wrong direction, [and]
(3) except for instruction offered pursuant to section 14-36j, permit a
class or classroom instruction to be offered in person in a congregate
setting, through distance learning or through a combination of both in-
person and distance learning, provided such distance learning has
interactive components such as mandatory interactions, participation or
testing, and (4) require that the behind-the-wheel instruction of any such
driver education program include instruction and practice regarding
how to stop in a safe location off the traveled portion of the highway
and respond to a traffic stop by a law enforcement officer.
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 235
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-78
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 14-36f
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a), "the gender of such student's instructor" was changed to
"that such student's instructor be of a certain gender" for clarity, in
Section 1(b), "concerning various safety measures undertaken by such
licensee. Such safety measures shall include, but need not be limited to,
whether" was changed to "indicating whether or not such licensee has
undertaken the following safety measures:" for clarity, in Section 1(b)(1),
"department" was changed to "Department of Motor Vehicles" for
clarity, in Section 1(b)(3), "such" was changed to "behind-the-wheel" for
consistency, and in Section 1(b)(5), "on-the-road" was changed to "such"
for consistency.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4